Hawaii statutes.
[§486P-5] Certification; participating
manufacturers; nonparticipating manufacturers. (a) Every tobacco product
manufacturer whose cigarettes are sold in this State, whether directly or
through a distributor, retailer, or similar intermediary or intermediaries,
shall execute and deliver in the manner prescribed by the attorney general, a
certification to the attorney general no later than September 30, 2003, and no
later than the thirtieth day of April each year thereafter, certifying that as
of the date of the certification the tobacco product manufacturer is either a
participating manufacturer or is in full compliance with section 675-3(b).

(b) A participating manufacturer shall include
in its certification a list of its brand families. The participating
manufacturer shall update the list thirty days prior to any addition to or
modification of its brand families by executing and delivering a supplemental
certification to the attorney general.

(c) A nonparticipating manufacturer shall
include in its certification:

(1) A complete list of all of its brand families that
identifies by name and address any other manufacturer of the brand families,
and that includes:

(A) A list of all of its brand families of
cigarettes and of the number of units sold for each brand family that was sold
in the State during the preceding calendar year, indicating by an asterisk any
brand family that is no longer being sold in the State as of the date of the
certification; and

(B) A list of its brand families that have been
sold in the State at any time during the current calendar year.

The nonparticipating manufacturer shall update
the list thirty days prior to any addition to or modification of its brand
families by executing and delivering a supplemental certification to the
attorney general;

(2) A statement that such nonparticipating
manufacturer is registered to do business in the State, or that such
nonparticipating manufacturer is a nonresident or foreign nonparticipating
manufacturer that has not registered to do business in this State as a foreign
corporation or business entity and has appointed an agent for service of
process and provided notice thereof pursuant to section 486P-4;

(3) A statement that the nonparticipating
manufacturer has established and continues to maintain a qualified escrow fund
required pursuant to section 675-3(b)(1), including:

(A) The name, address, and telephone number of
the financial institution where the nonparticipating manufacturer has
established such qualified escrow fund;

(B) The account number of the qualified escrow
fund or any sub-account number for the State;

(C) The amount the nonparticipating
manufacturer placed in such fund for cigarettes sold in the State during the
preceding calendar year, the date and amount of each such deposit, and such
evidence or verification as may be deemed necessary by the attorney general to
confirm the foregoing; and

(D) The amount and date of any withdrawal or
transfer of funds the nonparticipating manufacturer made at any time
from the fund or from any other qualified escrow fund into which the
nonparticipating manufacturer made escrow payments pursuant to section
675-3(b)(1);

(4) A statement that the nonparticipating
manufacturer has executed a qualified escrow agreement that has been reviewed
and approved by the attorney general and that governs the qualified escrow
fund; and

(5) A statement that the nonparticipating
manufacturer is in full compliance with this chapter, chapter 675, and any
rules adopted to implement this chapter or chapter 675.

(d) A tobacco product manufacturer may not
include a brand family in its certification unless:

(1) In the case of a participating manufacturer, the
participating manufacturer affirms that the brand family is to be deemed to be
its cigarettes for purposes of calculating its payments under the Master
Settlement Agreement for the relevant year, in the volume and shares determined
pursuant to the Master Settlement Agreement; and

(2) In the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer,
the nonparticipating manufacturer affirms that the brand family is to be deemed
to be its cigarettes for purposes of chapter 675.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as
limiting or otherwise affecting the State's right to maintain that a brand
family constitutes cigarettes of a different tobacco product manufacturer for
purposes of calculating payments under the Master Settlement Agreement or for
purposes of chapter 675.

(e) The attorney general may require at any
time from the nonparticipating manufacturer proof, from the financial
institution in which a tobacco product manufacturer has established a qualified
escrow fund for the purpose of compliance with section 675-3(b)(1), of the
amount of money in such fund, exclusive of interest, the amount and date of each
deposit to such fund, and the amount and date of each withdrawal from such
fund.

(f) A tobacco product manufacturer shall
maintain and make available to the attorney general, pursuant to this chapter,
all invoices and documentation of sale and other such information relied upon
for certification for a period of five years unless otherwise required by law.
[L 2003, c 77, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next